Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 5. Education Loan Program

§ 2861.
Establishment.

There is hereby created an Education Loan Program for the purpose of assisting qualified students to pursue schooling beyond the secondary level. It is the intention of the Legislature in establishing the Education Loan Program under this subchapter to serve Vermont resident students and their families throughout their educational careers; and to serve nonresident students attending Vermont postsecondary institutions and the families of those students throughout their educational careers. It is also the intention of the Legislature that education loans made under this subchapter not be collateralized at the time of their origination.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 7(a); amended

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2862.
Rules and regulations.

The Board shall adopt rules and regulations and establish policies and procedures that it deems necessary to carry out the purpose of this subchapter. The rules and regulations so adopted shall include provisions relating to borrower eligibility, maximum loan amounts, interest rates, and other charges.

In the case of loans reinsured under the Higher Education Act, the rules and regulations shall conform to the requirements of that act.

Education loans guaranteed, made, financed, serviced, or otherwise administered by the Corporation are exempt from the interest rate and charges limitations of

9 V.S.A. §§ 41a

and 42, but those rates and charges shall reflect the Corporation’s costs of funds, its costs of education loan financing and servicing, and the risks associated with different types of education loans.

Loans made pursuant to the Higher Education Act by institutions doing business in Vermont shall be made pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 7(b); amended

1967, No. 131

, § 8;

1967, No. 371

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 27, 1968;

1969, No. 83

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1969;

1973, No. 51

;

1983, No. 76

, § 2;

1987, No. 79

, § 2, eff. June 9, 1987;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 2863.
Guarantee.

The Corporation is authorized to guarantee that any education loan notes properly executed shall be repaid according to their tenor and, if guaranteed under the Higher Education Act, to the extent authorized under that act, provided, that in the event of default, the holder has complied with the rules, regulations, and procedures of the Corporation, and with the Act and the regulations promulgated under the Act, regarding the making, servicing, and diligent collection of education loans until assigned to the Corporation as provided in this chapter. The Corporation may make loans that have no guarantee.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 7(c); amended

1975, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 102.

§ 2864.
Reserve fund.

The Corporation shall establish and maintain an allowance for loans not covered by a federal or other guaranty or insurance, using historical loan delinquency and default rates and other relevant information. To the extent the reserve fund contains any monies appropriated by the State, such reserve funds shall be held and administered in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 432

and 433. Any such allowance may not be funded from monies appropriated by the General Assembly to the Corporation unless specifically appropriated for such purposes.

The Corporation is authorized to negotiate and enter into agreement with the U.S. Secretary of Education to reinsure its guarantee of any loans made under this chapter, and to amend such agreements, consistent with this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 7(d); amended

1969, No. 83

, § 2, eff. April 18, 1969;

1981, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 20, 1982;

1993, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 2865.
Default.

A holder of a loan guaranteed pursuant to this chapter may submit a default claim to the Corporation for payment when a borrower has failed to make an installment payment of principal or interest or both when due or to comply with other terms of the note or other written evidence of agreement, which persists beyond the delinquency period provided in the Higher Education Act. Upon the holder’s compliance with the servicing and the default claim filing requirements specified in section 2863 of this chapter, the Corporation shall pay the holder the amount due as described in section 2863 of this title. Upon reimbursement, the holder shall assign the note to the Corporation, but such assignment may be without representation or warranty, expressed or implied, and without recourse.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 7(e); amended

1969, No. 83

, § 3, eff. April 18, 1969;

1975, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1993, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 2866.
Rights of minors.

A person under 18 years of age shall not be disqualified or lack capacity by reason of the person’s minority, but shall have the rights, powers, privileges, and obligations of a person of full age with respect to executing instruments under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

1965, No. 198

, § 7(f); amended

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 28.

§ 2867.
Reserve and pledged equity funds.

The Corporation may create and establish one or more special funds, referred to in this section as “debt service reserve funds” or “pledged equity funds.”

The Corporation shall pay into each debt service reserve fund:

Any monies appropriated and made available by the State for the purpose of such fund.

Any proceeds of the sale of notes, bonds, or other debt instruments, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of the Corporation authorizing the issuance thereof.

Any other monies or financial instruments such as surety bonds, letters of credit, or similar obligations, that may be made available to the Corporation for the purpose of such fund from any other source or sources. All monies or financial instruments held in any debt service reserve fund created and established under this section, except as provided in this section, shall be used, as required, solely for the payment of the principal of the bonds, notes, or other debt instruments secured in whole or in part by such fund or of the payments with respect to the bonds, notes, or other debt instruments specified in any resolution of the Corporation as a sinking fund payment, the purchase or redemption of the bonds, the payment of interest on the bonds, notes, or other debt instruments, or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when the bonds, notes, or other debt instruments are redeemed prior to maturity, or to reimburse the issuer of a liquidity or credit facility, bond insurance, or other credit enhancement for the payment by such party of any of the foregoing amounts on the Corporation’s behalf; provided, however, that the monies or financial instruments in any such debt reserve fund shall not be drawn upon or withdrawn at any time in such amounts as would reduce the amount of such funds to less than the debt service reserve requirement established by resolution of the Corporation for such fund as provided in this section except for the purpose of paying, when due, with respect to bonds secured in whole or in part by such fund, the principal, interest, redemption premiums, and sinking fund payments and reimbursing, when due, the issuer of any credit enhancement for any such payments made by it, for the payment of which other monies of the Corporation are not available. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, any debt service reserve fund due to the investment thereof may be transferred by the Corporation to other funds or accounts of the Corporation to the extent it does not reduce the amount of such debt service reserve fund below the debt service reserve requirement for such fund.

The Corporation shall pay into each pledged equity fund:

Any monies appropriated and made available by the State for the purpose of such fund.

Any proceeds of the sale of notes, bonds, or other debt instruments, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of the Corporation authorizing the issuance thereof.

Any other monies or financial instruments such as surety bonds, letters of credit, or similar obligations, that may be made available to the Corporation for the purpose of such fund from any other source or sources. All monies or financial instruments held in any pledged equity fund created and established under this section, except as provided in this section, shall be used, as required, solely to provide pledged equity or over-collateralization of any trust estate of the Corporation to the issuer of a liquidity or credit facility, bond insurance, or other credit enhancement obtained by the Corporation; provided, however, that the monies or financial instruments in any such pledged equity fund shall not be drawn upon or withdrawn from such fund at any time in such amounts as would reduce the amount of such funds to less than the pledged equity requirement established by resolution of the Corporation for such fund as hereafter provided except for the purposes set forth in, and in accordance with, the governing resolution. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, any pledged equity fund due to the investment thereof may be transferred by the Corporation to other funds or accounts of the Corporation to the extent it does not reduce the amount of such pledged equity fund below the requirement for such fund. Anything in this subdivision to the contrary notwithstanding, upon the defeasance of the bonds, notes, or other debt instruments with respect to which the pledged equity requirement was established, the Corporation may transfer amounts in such fund to another fund or account of the Corporation proportionately to the amount of such defeasance, provided that the Corporation shall repay to the State any amount appropriated by the State pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

The debt service reserve and pledged equity requirements for any fund established under this section shall be established by resolution of the Corporation prior to the issuance of any bonds, notes, or other debt instruments secured in whole or in part by a debt service reserve fund or prior to entering into any credit enhancement agreement and shall be the amount determined by the Corporation to be reasonably required in light of the facts and circumstances of the particular debt issue or credit enhancement; provided that the maximum amount of the State’s commitment with respect to any pledged equity fund shall be determined by the Corporation at or prior to entering into any credit enhancement agreement related to such pledged equity fund. The Corporation shall not at any time issue bonds, notes, or other debt instruments secured in whole or in part by a debt service reserve fund or enter into any credit enhancement agreement that requires establishment of a pledged equity fund created and established under this section unless:

the Corporation at the time of such issuance or execution shall deposit in such fund from the proceeds of such bonds, notes, or other debt instruments, or from other sources, an amount that, together with the amount then in such fund, will not be less than the requirement established for such fund at that time;

the Corporation has made a determination at the time of the authorization of the issuance of such bonds, notes, or other debt instruments, or entering into such credit enhancement agreement that the Corporation will derive revenues or other income from the education loans that secure such bonds, notes, or other debt instruments or that relate to any credit enhancement agreement sufficient to provide, together with all other available revenues and income of the Corporation, other than any amounts appropriated by the State pursuant to this section, for the payment of such bonds, notes, and other debt instruments and reimbursement to the issuer of any credit enhancement, the payment of any expected deposits into any pledged equity fund established with respect to such credit enhancement and the payment of all costs and expenses incurred by the Corporation with respect to the program or purpose for which such bonds, notes, or other debt instruments are issued; and

the State Treasurer or his or her designee has provided written approval to the Corporation that the Corporation may issue such bonds, notes, or other debt instruments and enter into any related credit enhancement agreement.

In computing the amount of the debt service reserve or pledged equity funds for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of such funds shall be invested shall be valued at par if purchased at par or at amortized value, as such term is defined by resolution of the Corporation, if purchased at other than par.

In order to ensure the maintenance of the debt service reserve fund requirement in each debt service reserve fund established by the Corporation under this section, there may be appropriated annually and paid to the Corporation for deposit in each such sum as shall be certified by the Chair of the Corporation to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House as is necessary to establish or restore each such debt service reserve fund to an amount equal to the requirement for each such fund. The Chair shall annually, on or about February 1, make, execute, and deliver to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House, a certificate stating the sum required to restore each such fund to the amount equal to the requirement for each such fund, and the Governor shall, on or before March 1, submit a request for appropriations in the amount so certified, and such amount may be appropriated, and if appropriated, shall be paid to the Corporation during the then current State fiscal year. In order to ensure the funding of the pledged equity fund requirement in each pledged equity fund established by the Corporation under this section at the time and in the amount determined at the time of entering into any credit enhancement agreement related to a pledged equity fund, there may be appropriated and paid to the Corporation for deposit in each such fund, such sum as shall be certified by the Chair of the Corporation, to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House, as is necessary to establish each such pledged equity fund to an amount equal to the amount determined by the Corporation at the time of entering into any credit enhancement agreement related to a pledged equity fund, provided that the amount requested, together with any amounts previously appropriated pursuant to this subsection for a particular pledged equity fund, shall not exceed the maximum amount of the State’s commitment, as determined by the Corporation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. The Chair shall, on or about the February 1 next following the designated date for fully funding a pledged equity fund, make, execute, and deliver to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House a certificate stating the sum required to bring each such fund to the amount equal to the requirement for each such fund or to otherwise satisfy the State’s commitment with respect to each such fund, and the Governor shall, on or before March 1, submit a request for appropriations in the amount so certified, and such amount may be appropriated, and if appropriated, shall be paid to the Corporation during the then-current State fiscal year. The combined principal amount of bonds, notes, and other debt instruments outstanding at any time and secured in whole or in part by a debt service reserve fund established under this section and the aggregate commitment of the State to fund pledged equity funds pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed $50,000,000.00, provided that the foregoing shall not impair the obligation of any contract or contracts entered into by the Corporation in contravention of the Constitution of the United States. Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the State’s obligation with respect to funding any pledged equity fund shall be limited to its maximum commitment, as determined by the Corporation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section and the State shall have no other obligation to replenish or maintain any pledged equity fund.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 2

, § 1, eff. March 31, 2009; amended

2011, No. 40

, § 55a, eff. May 20, 2011;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 103.

§ 2868.
Notes, bonds, and other obligations.

Power to issue obligations. The Corporation may issue its negotiable notes, bonds, and other obligations in such principal amount as the Corporation determines necessary to provide sufficient funds for the availability of loans for educational purposes. The notes, bonds, and other obligations may be issued in taxable form or nontaxable form, or both. The taxability of one series shall not affect the taxability of any other series, nor shall the issuance of taxable obligations be deemed a waiver of the right of this State or the Corporation to issue nontaxable obligations.

Repayment. The Corporation may make payment of the principal of and interest on its notes, bonds, and other obligations and may determine the funding, refunding, or renewal of the reserves and sinking funds to secure the notes, bonds, and other obligations, and all other expenditures of the Corporation incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out such corporate purpose, including costs of issuance of such debt. The Corporation may contract with any person, including the State of Vermont or the United States, or any of their agencies or instrumentalities, to guarantee all or a part of the principal of or interest on the Corporation’s obligations or on the education loans made, purchased, guaranteed, or serviced by the Corporation.

Power to determine nature of debt obligations. In furtherance of its corporate purposes, with respect to the issuance of its notes, bonds, and other debt obligations, the Corporation may by resolution provide:

for the pledging or granting of a security interest in all or a portion of its property and revenues, including the granting of security interests of differing priorities in education loans and the revenues associated therewith, subject to such agreements as may then exist with holders of the Corporation’s notes, bonds, or other obligations;

the terms upon which payments are to be made upon such notes, bonds, and other obligations by the Corporation;

the form of such notes, bonds, and other obligations, which may include “book entry” if the Corporation so determines;

the conditions upon which such notes, bonds, and other obligations may be transferred; and

for limitations on the Corporation’s issuance of additional notes, bonds, or other debt obligations, and on the expenditure of revenues related to them; and upon the refunding of its outstanding or other notes, bonds, or other obligations.

Nonenumerated powers. The Corporation has the power to exercise all or part of a combination of the powers granted in this chapter; to make covenants other than and in addition to, but not inconsistent with, the covenants expressly authorized in this section; to make such covenants and to do any and all acts and things as may be necessary or prudent to adequately secure its notes, bonds, or other obligations or as will tend to make its notes, bonds, and other obligations more marketable notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things are not enumerated in this section.

Pledges. Any pledge made by the Corporation shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues, monies, or property so pledged and thereafter received by the Corporation shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery of it or further act. That pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Corporation, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of it.

Indemnification. Neither the members of the Board nor executive officers of the Corporation nor any other person executing the Corporation’s notes, bonds, or other obligations shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of such notes, bonds, or other obligations.

Fully negotiable instruments. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a bond, note, or other obligation issued under this chapter is fully negotiable for all purposes of 9A V.S.A. § 1-101 et seq., and each holder or owner of such, or of any coupon appurtenant to them, by accepting the bond or note or other obligation or coupon shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that such instrument is fully negotiable for those purposes, and all bonds, notes, or other obligations and interest coupons appertaining to them issued by the Corporation shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of investment securities under 9A V.S.A. § 1-101 et seq., but no provision of those sections respecting the filing of a financing statement to perfect a security interest shall be applicable to any pledge made or security interest created in connection with the issuance of the bonds, notes, other obligations, or coupons.

No impairment by the State. The State does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of the notes, bonds, and other obligations issued under this chapter that the State will not limit or restrict the rights hereby vested in the Corporation to perform its obligations and to fulfill the terms of any agreement made with the holders of its bonds or notes or other obligations. Neither will the State in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the notes and bonds and other obligations, together with interest on them, and interest on any unpaid installments of interest, are fully met, paid, and discharged. The Corporation is authorized to execute this pledge and agreement of the State in any agreement with the holders of the notes or bonds or other obligations.

No liability of the State. Notes, bonds, or other obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability or obligation of the State of Vermont or of any political subdivision of it, nor shall it be deemed to constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the Corporation pledged to support them. Each obligation issued by the Corporation shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the Corporation shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest on it except from the revenues or assets pledged for those purposes and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of Vermont or of any political subdivision of it is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on these obligations.

Legal investment. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State and all public officers, governmental units, and agencies of the State; all banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; all credit unions; and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, monies, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or notes or other obligations issued under this chapter, and the bonds or notes or other obligations are authorized security for any and all public deposits.

Role of the Corporation. The Corporation is designated as the guarantor, servicer, and secondary loan market for all educational loans in this State.

8 V.S.A. Chapter 73 inapplicable. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 73 (licensed lenders, mortgage brokers, mortgage loan originators, sales finance companies, and loan solicitation companies) shall not apply to the Corporation or to any loan made, purchased, or guaranteed pursuant to this chapter.

Interest rate exchange agreements. The Corporation may enter into one or more agreements for the exchange of interest rates, cash flows, or payments, to reduce net borrowing costs, achieve desirable net effective interest rates in connection with its issuance and sale of debt obligations, and to provide for an efficient means of debt management.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 20, 1982; amended

1985, No. 24

, § 1, eff. April 26, 1985;

1989, No. 29

, § 1 eff. April 26, 1989;

1993, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 104;

2021, No. 20

, § 64.

§ 2869.
Loan cancellation; mathematics, science, and computer science teachers.

Loans obtained under this subchapter may be partially or completely cancelled and forgiven for a borrower who is employed for a complete academic school year as a full-time licensed teacher:

in a Vermont elementary or secondary school that is approved by the State Board; and

in the subject area of mathematics, science, or computer science during a year when there is a critical shortage of licensed teachers in that area.

Annually, the Board of the Corporation shall determine, after consultation with the Secretary, whether a critical shortage of licensed teachers exists in each of the subject areas of mathematics, science, and computer science.

The Board shall determine the amount of loan to be cancelled for each complete academic year of teaching service. The amount cancelled for each year shall not exceed 25 percent of the original principal amount plus any accrued interest.

This section is subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated for loan cancellations under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 76

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 118

, § 3;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 188, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.